Florida, session 2026, SB1762.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 945.231, Florida Statutes, is created to 31 read: 32 945.231âCriminal Justice Commission.â 33 (1)âThere is created the Criminal Justice Commission. The 34 commission is assigned to the department for administrative 35 purposes but shall exercise its duties independently of the 36 department. 37 (2)âThe purpose of the commission is to evaluate, advise, 38 and make policy recommendations regarding this stateâs criminal 39 justice system which analyze the next 20 years of needs and 40 challenges in the state correctional system. The commission 41 shall help advance long-term strategic improvements in criminal 42 justice policy, workforce capacity, facility planning, and 43 systemwide reform. 44 (3)âThe commission shall be composed of the following 45 members: 46 (a)âOne member appointed by the President of the Senate. 47 (b)âOne member appointed by the Speaker of the House of 48 Representatives. 49 (c)âThe Attorney General, or his or her designee. 50 (d)âThe secretary of the department, or his or her 51 designee. 52 (e)âOne member, appointed by the Governor, who is a 53 sheriff, a chief of police, or a representative of a state law 54 enforcement agency. 55 (f)âOne member, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 56 Representatives, who is a representative of a victimâs rights 57 organization, a criminal justice reform advocate, a formerly 58 incarcerated individual, or a reentry program leader. 59 (g)âOne member, appointed by the President of the Senate, 60 who is a professor or researcher specializing in criminology, 61 public policy, or law or a data analyst with expertise in 62 criminal justice metrics. 63 (4)âMembers shall serve up to two 4-year terms. For the 64 purpose of achieving staggered terms, the initial appointments 65 under paragraphs (3)(e), (f), and (g) shall be for 2 years. Any 66 vacancy must be filled by appointment by the original appointing 67 authority for the unexpired portion of the term. The members 68 shall elect from among the committeeâs membership a chair and 69 vice chair, who shall hold their respective positions for 2-year 70 terms. 71 (5)âThe commission shall do all of the following: 72 (a)âEvaluate and recommend strategic initiatives derived 73 from the findings of the 2023 KPMG Master Plan Report, including 74 recommendations concerning correctional workforce development, 75 facilities modernization, long-term capacity planning, and 76 operational reforms. 77 (b)âConduct comprehensive reviews of the stateâs criminal 78 justice system, including, but not limited to, policing, 79 sentencing, corrections, and community supervision. 80 (c)âRecommend reforms to ensure fair, proportional, and 81 evidence-based punishment. 82 (d)âAssess corrections policies, including, but not limited 83 to, prison conditions, parole, probation, and supervised 84 release. 85 (e)âPromote, evaluate, and recommend reentry initiatives 86 designed to reduce recidivism and assist returning citizens. 87 (f)âAddress racial, economic, disability-related, and 88 geographic disparities in the criminal justice system. 89 (g)âCollect, maintain, and analyze data-driven metrics on 90 crime rates, sentencing patterns, incarceration trends, and 91 correctional outcomes. 92 (h)âIssue an initial report by July 1, 2027, and annually 93 thereafter, to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 94 the Speaker of the House of Representatives containing findings, 95 performance metrics, and policy recommendations. 96 (6)âThe commission may do all of the following: 97 (a)âConduct public hearings, listening sessions, and 98 community outreach and solicit testimony from experts, 99 stakeholders, and affected communities. 100 (b)âRequest and receive data, reports, and information from 101 state agencies, law enforcement agencies, and the judiciary. 102 (c)âDevelop pilot programs, grant proposals, or 103 demonstration projects testing innovative criminal justice 104 reform strategies or correctional improvements. 105 (d)âPartner with academic institutions, research 106 organizations, or national experts to conduct impact studies, 107 cost-benefit analyses, and system evaluations. 108 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.